New York, session 2025-2026, S6423.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 3635 of the education law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph h to read as follows: 3 h. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the 4 city school districts of the cities of Buffalo, Rochester, Syracuse and 5 Yonkers, pursuant to adoption of a resolution by the board of education 6 setting forth a plan, and approval of such plan by the commissioner, may 7 provide transportation services for children residing within the 8 district attending kindergarten through grade twelve who live one-half 9 mile or more from the school they legally attend if such transportation 10 is deemed necessary pursuant to a determination by the commissioner due 11 to safety concerns. Such transportation services shall be restricted to 12 transportation to and from children's homes or before or after-school 13 child care locations and, if offered, shall be provided for each student 14 up to a distance of fifteen miles. Transportation pursuant to this para- 15 graph shall be offered equally to all children in like circumstances 16 residing in the district. For the purpose of computing approved trans- 17 portation expenses for transportation aid, expenses for transportation 18 provided pursuant to this paragraph shall be included. The school 19 district shall provide a report to the governor, the speaker of the 20 assembly, the temporary president of the senate and the commissioner on 21 the results of the first three years of the program, including the cost 22 and benefit analysis of increased or decreased costs for the school 23 district and the state, and the impact on student attendance and academ- 24 ic performance of the school district, on or before September fifteenth, 25 two thousand twenty-eight. 26 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10202-01-5